Maryland, session 2026, SB0127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “food desert” has the meaning stated in § 6–301 of the Housing
and Community Development Article.
(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall:
(1) study food deserts in Baltimore County; and
(2) make recommendations:
(i) to reduce the number of food deserts in Baltimore County; and
(ii) regarding available funding sources for fresh food financing
initiatives and programs in the State.
(c) In conducting the study and making the recommendations, the Department
shall:
(1) review food desert projects located in Baltimore County funded under §
6–308.3 of the Housing and Community Development Article;
(2) analyze the location of food deserts in Baltimore County;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0127*

SENATE BILL 127
(3) determine the impact of food deserts on the Baltimore County
population and economy;
(4) develop strategies to attract grocery stores and supermarket retailers
to food deserts in Baltimore County, including identifying and analyzing anticipated costs;
and
(5) review existing incentives and available financing programs to
encourage the establishment of grocery stores and supermarket retailers in identified food
deserts in Baltimore County.
(d) On or before November 30, 2026, the Department shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the Senate
Finance Committee, and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.